Florida, session 2026, SB290.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 275 276 Section 1.âSection 125.489, Florida Statutes, is created to 277 read: 278 125.489âPreemption of restrictions on gasoline-powered farm 279 equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment.â 280 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 281 (a)ââGasoline-powered farm equipmentâ means any machine 282 powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that uses 283 gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is used 284 on a farm or used to transport farm products. 285 (b)ââGasoline-powered landscape equipmentâ means any 286 machine powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that 287 uses gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is 288 used to provide landscape management or maintenance or to move 289 leaves, dirt, grass, or other debris off of sidewalks, 290 driveways, lawns, or other surfaces. 291 (2)âA county may not enact or enforce a resolution, an 292 ordinance, a rule, a code, or a policy or take any action that 293 restricts or prohibits the use of gasoline-powered farm 294 equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment and may not 295 create differing standards for such equipment or distinguish 296 such equipment from any electric or similar equipment in a 297 retail, manufacturer, or distributor setting. 298 (3)âThis section does not prohibit or limit a county from 299 encouraging the use of alternative farm or landscape equipment, 300 such as battery-powered farm or landscape equipment. 301 Section 2.âPresent subsections (18) through (30) and (31) 302 through (54) of section 163.3164, Florida Statutes, are 303 redesignated as subsections (19) through (31) and (33) through 304 (56), respectively, and new subsections (18) and (32) are added 305 to that section, to read: 306 163.3164âCommunity Planning Act; definitions.âAs used in 307 this act: 308 (18)ââEcologically significant parcelâ means a parcel of 309 land located within the boundaries of a low-density municipality 310 which is currently undeveloped and has been designated as either 311 rural, conservation, agricultural, or greenspace as provided by 312 a local government comprehensive plan developed pursuant to s. 313 163.3177. 314 (32)ââLow-density municipalityâ means a municipality 315 existing on or before January 1, 2025, which is less than 2,500 316 acres in total size and contains a population of 5,000 or fewer 317 legal residents. 318 Section 3.âPresent subsection (7) of section 163.3202, 319 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (8), and a new 320 subsection (7) is added to that section, to read: 321 163.3202âLand development regulations.â 322 (7)(a)âNotwithstanding any ordinance to the contrary, an 323 application for a development on an ecologically significant 324 parcel in a low-density municipality may not be administratively 325 approved without an attestation provided by the developer, under 326 penalty of perjury, to the low-density municipality which states 327 that the development will not exceed a maximum density of 1 328 residential unit per 20 acres. 329 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to applications for the 330 construction of residential units on an ecologically significant 331 parcel for the express purpose of providing housing for family 332 members of the applicant. However, the applicant must provide an 333 attestation, under penalty of perjury, to the low-density 334 municipality which states that the residential units being 335 constructed will be used for such express purpose before the 336 administrative approval of an application for development. 337 (c)âThe density requirements provided in this subsection 338 may be waived upon a resolution approved by a unanimous vote of 339 the commission or council of the low-density municipality. 340 Section 4.âSection 166.063, Florida Statutes, is created to 341 read: 342 166.063âPreemption of restrictions on gasoline-powered farm 343 equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment.â 344 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 345 (a)ââGasoline-powered farm equipmentâ means a machine 346 powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that uses 347 gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is used 348 on a farm or used to transport farm products. 349 (b)ââGasoline-powered landscape equipmentâ means any 350 machine powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that 351 uses gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is 352 used to provide landscape management or maintenance or to move 353 leaves, dirt, grass, or other debris off of sidewalks, 354 driveways, lawns, or other surfaces. 355 (2)âA municipality may not enact or enforce a resolution, 356 an ordinance, a rule, a code, or a policy or take any action 357 that restricts or prohibits the use of gasoline-powered farm 358 equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment and may not 359 create differing standards for such equipment or distinguish 360 such equipment from any electric or similar equipment in a 361 retail, manufacturer, or distributor setting. 362 (3)âThis section does not prohibit or limit a municipality 363 from encouraging the use of alternative farm or landscape 364 equipment, such as battery-powered farm or landscape equipment. 365 Section 5.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 366 212.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 367 212.055âDiscretionary sales surtaxes; legislative intent; 368 authorization and use of proceeds.âIt is the legislative intent 369 that any authorization for imposition of a discretionary sales 370 surtax shall be published in the Florida Statutes as a 371 subsection of this section, irrespective of the duration of the 372 levy. Each enactment shall specify the types of counties 373 authorized to levy; the rate or rates which may be imposed; the 374 maximum length of time the surtax may be imposed, if any; the 375 procedure which must be followed to secure voter approval, if 376 required; the purpose for which the proceeds may be expended; 377 and such other requirements as the Legislature may provide. 378 Taxable transactions and administrative procedures shall be as 379 provided in s. 212.054. 380 (2)âLOCAL GOVERNMENT INFRASTRUCTURE SURTAX.â 381 (d)âThe proceeds of the surtax authorized by this 382 subsection and any accrued interest shall be expended by the 383 school district, within the county and municipalities within the 384 county, or, in the case of a negotiated joint county agreement, 385 within another county, to finance, plan, and construct 386 infrastructure; to acquire any interest in land for public 387 recreation, conservation, or protection of natural resources or 388 to prevent or satisfy private property rights claims resulting 389 from limitations imposed by the designation of an area of 390 critical state concern; to provide loans, grants, or rebates to 391 residential or commercial property owners who make energy 392 efficiency improvements to their residential or commercial 393 property, if a local government ordinance authorizing such use 394 is approved by referendum; or to finance the closure of county 395 owned or municipally owned solid waste landfills that have been 396 closed or are required to be closed by order of the Department 397 of Environmental Protection. Any use of the proceeds or interest 398 for purposes of landfill closure before July 1, 1993, is 399 ratified. The proceeds and any interest may not be used for the 400 operational expenses of infrastructure, except that a county 401 that has a population of fewer than 75,000 and that is required 402 to close a landfill may use the proceeds or interest for long 403 term maintenance costs associated with landfill closure. 404 Counties, as defined in s. 125.011, and charter counties may, in 405 addition, use the proceeds or interest to retire or service 406 indebtedness incurred for bonds issued before July 1, 1987, for 407 infrastructure purposes, and for bonds subsequently issued to 408 refund such bonds. Any use of the proceeds or interest for 409 purposes of retiring or servicing indebtedness incurred for 410 refunding bonds before July 1, 1999, is ratified. 411 1.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term 412 âinfrastructureâ means: 413 a.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 414 associated with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement 415 of public facilities that have a life expectancy of 5 or more 416 years, any related land acquisition, land improvement, design, 417 and engineering costs, and all other professional and related 418 costs required to bring the public facilities into service. For 419 purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term âpublic facilitiesâ 420 has the same meaning means facilities as defined in s. 421 163.3164(43) s. 163.3164(41), s. 163.3221(13), or s. 189.012(5), 422 and includes facilities that are necessary to carry out 423 governmental purposes, including, but not limited to, fire 424 stations, general governmental office buildings, and animal 425 shelters, regardless of whether the facilities are owned by the 426 local taxing authority or another governmental entity. 427 b.âA fire department vehicle, an emergency medical service 428 vehicle, a sheriffâs office vehicle, a police department 429 vehicle, or any other vehicle, and the equipment necessary to 430 outfit the vehicle for its official use or equipment that has a 431 life expectancy of at least 5 years. 432 c.âAny expenditure for the construction, lease, or 433 maintenance of, or provision of utilities or security for, 434 facilities, as defined in s. 29.008. 435 d.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 436 associated with the improvement of private facilities that have 437 a life expectancy of 5 or more years and that the owner agrees 438 to make available for use on a temporary basis as needed by a 439 local government as a public emergency shelter or a staging area 440 for emergency response equipment during an emergency officially 441 declared by the state or by the local government under s. 442 252.38. Such improvements are limited to those necessary to 443 comply with current standards for public emergency evacuation 444 shelters. The owner must enter into a written contract with the 445 local government providing the improvement funding to make the 446 private facility available to the public for purposes of 447 emergency shelter at no cost to the local government for a 448 minimum of 10 years after completion of the improvement, with 449 the provision that the obligation will transfer to any 450 subsequent owner until the end of the minimum period. 451 e.âAny land acquisition expenditure for a residential 452 housing project in which at least 30 percent of the units are 453 affordable to individuals or families whose total annual 454 household income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median 455 income adjusted for household size, if the land is owned by a 456 local government or by a special district that enters into a 457 written agreement with the local government to provide such 458 housing. The local government or special district may enter into 459 a ground lease with a public or private person or entity for 460 nominal or other consideration for the construction of the 461 residential housing project on land acquired pursuant to this 462 sub-subparagraph. 463 f.âInstructional technology used solely in a school 464 districtâs classrooms. As used in this sub-subparagraph, the 465 term âinstructional technologyâ means an interactive device that 466 assists a teacher in instructing a class or a group of students 467 and includes the necessary hardware and software to operate the 468 interactive device. The term also includes support systems in 469 which an interactive device may mount and is not required to be 470 affixed to the facilities. 471 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âenergy 472 efficiency improvementâ means any energy conservation and 473 efficiency improvement that reduces consumption through 474 conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural 475 gas, propane, or other forms of energy on the property, 476 including, but not limited to, air sealing; installation of 477 insulation; installation of energy-efficient heating, cooling, 478 or ventilation systems; installation of solar panels; building 479 modifications to increase the use of daylight or shade; 480 replacement of windows; installation of energy controls or 481 energy recovery systems; installation of electric vehicle 482 charging equipment; installation of systems for natural gas fuel 483 as defined in s. 206.9951; and installation of efficient 484 lighting equipment. 485 3.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, 486 a local government infrastructure surtax imposed or extended 487 after July 1, 1998, may allocate up to 15 percent of the surtax 488 proceeds for deposit into a trust fund within the countyâs 489 accounts created for the purpose of funding economic development 490 projects having a general public purpose of improving local 491 economies, including the funding of operational costs and 492 incentives related to economic development. The ballot statement 493 must indicate the intention to make an allocation under the 494 authority of this subparagraph. 495 4.âSurtax revenues that are shared with eligible charter 496 schools pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be allocated among such 497 schools based on each schoolâs proportionate share of total 498 school district capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment 499 as adopted by the education estimating conference established in 500 s. 216.136. Surtax revenues must be expended by the charter 501 school in a manner consistent with the allowable uses provided 502 in s. 1013.62(4). All revenues and expenditures shall be 503 accounted for in a charter schoolâs monthly or quarterly 504 financial statement pursuant to s. 1002.33(9). If a schoolâs 505 charter is not renewed or is terminated and the school is 506 dissolved under the provisions of law under which the school was 507 organized, any unencumbered funds received under this paragraph 508 shall revert to the sponsor. 509 Section 6.âPresent subsection (19) of section 253.0341, 510 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (21), and new 511 subsection (19) and subsection (20) are added to that section, 512 to read: 513 253.0341âSurplus of state-owned lands.â 514 (19)âThe Acquisition and Restoration Council shall 515 determine whether any lands surplused by a local governmental 516 entity, as defined in s. 218.72, on or after January 1, 2024, 517 are suitable for bona fide agricultural purposes, as defined in 518 s. 193.461(3)(b). A local governmental entity may not transfer 519 future development rights for any surplused lands determined to 520 be suitable for bona fide agricultural purposes on or after 521 January 1, 2024. 522 (20)âThe Department of Environmental Protection, in 523 coordination with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 524 Services, shall determine whether any state-owned conservation 525 lands acquired on or after January 1, 2024, are suitable for 526 bona fide agricultural purposes, as defined in s. 193.461(3)(b). 527 (a)âNotwithstanding any other law or rule, the Department 528 of Environmental Protection may surplus state-owned conservation 529 lands acquired on or after January 1, 2024, determined to be 530 suitable for bona fide agricultural purposes. 531 (b)âFor all state-owned conservation lands determined to be 532 suitable for bona fide agricultural production and surplused by 533 the Department of Environmental Protection, the department shall 534 retain a rural-lands-protection easement pursuant to s. 535 570.71(3). All proceeds from the sale of such surplused lands 536 must be deposited into the Incidental Trust Fund within the 537 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for less than 538 fee simple land acquisition pursuant to ss. 570.71 and 570.715. 539 (c)âBy January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter, the 540 Department of Environmental Protection shall provide a report of 541 state-owned conservation lands surplused pursuant to this 542 subsection to the Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement 543 Trust Fund. 544 (d)âDesignated state forest lands, state park lands, 545 wildlife management areas, or lands within the boundaries of the 546 federally authorized and approved Comprehensive Everglades 547 Restoration Plan may not be surplused pursuant to this 548 subsection. 549 Section 7.âSection 259.1053, Florida Statutes, is amended 550 to read: 551 259.1053âBabcock Ranch Preserve; Babcock Ranch Advisory 552 Group.â 553 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âBabcock 554 Ranch Preserve Act.â 555 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 556 (a)ââBabcock Ranch Preserveâ and âpreserveâ mean the lands 557 and facilities acquired in the purchase of the Babcock Crescent 558 B Ranch, as provided in s. 259.1052. 559 (b)ââCommissionâ means the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 560 Commission. 561 (c)ââCommissionerâ means the Commissioner of Agriculture. 562 (d)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and 563 Consumer Services. 564 (e)ââExecutive directorâ means the Executive Director of 565 the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission. 566 (f)ââFinancially self-sustainingâ means having management 567 and operation expenditures not more than the revenues collected 568 from fees and other receipts for resource use and development 569 and from interest and invested funds. 570 (g)ââFlorida Forest Serviceâ means the Florida Forest 571 Service of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. 572 (h)ââMultiple useâ means the management of all of the 573 renewable surface resources of the Babcock Ranch Preserve to 574 best meet the needs of the public, including the use of the land 575 for some or all of the renewable surface resources or related 576 services over areas large enough to allow for periodic 577 adjustments in use to conform to the changing needs and 578 conditions of the preserve while recognizing that a portion of 579 the land will be used for some of the renewable surface 580 resources available on that land. The goal of multiple use is 581 the harmonious and coordinated management of the renewable 582 surface resources without impairing the productivity of the land 583 and considering the relative value of the renewable surface 584 resources, and not necessarily a combination of uses to provide 585 the greatest monetary return or the greatest unit output. 586 (i)ââSustained yield of the renewable surface resourcesâ 587 means the achievement and maintenance of a high level of annual 588 or regular periodic output of the various renewable surface 589 resources of the preserve without impairing the productivity of 590 the land. 591 (3)âCREATION OF BABCOCK RANCH PRESERVE.â 592 (a)âUpon the date of acquisition of the Babcock Crescent B 593 Ranch, there is created the Babcock Ranch Preserve, which shall 594 be managed in accordance with the purposes and requirements of 595 this section. 596 (b)âThe preserve is established to protect and preserve the 597 environmental, agricultural, scientific, scenic, geologic, 598 watershed, fish, wildlife, historic, cultural, and recreational 599 values of the preserve, and to provide for the multiple use and 600 sustained yield of the renewable surface resources within the 601 preserve consistent with this section. 602 (c)âThis section does not preclude the use of common 603 varieties of mineral materials such as sand, stone, and gravel 604 for construction and maintenance of roads and facilities within 605 the preserve. 606 (d)âThis section does not affect the constitutional 607 responsibilities of the commission in the exercise of its 608 regulatory and executive power with respect to wild animal life 609 and freshwater aquatic life, including the regulation of 610 hunting, fishing, and trapping within the preserve. 611 (e)âThis section does not interfere with or prevent the 612 implementation of agricultural practices authorized by the 613 agricultural land use designations established in the local 614 comprehensive plans of either Charlotte County or Lee County as 615 those plans apply to the Babcock Ranch Preserve. 616 (f)âThis section does not preclude the maintenance and use 617 of roads and trails or the relocation of roads in existence on 618 the effective date of this section, or the construction, 619 maintenance, and use of new trails, or any motorized access 620 necessary for the administration of the land contained within 621 the preserve, including motorized access necessary for 622 emergencies involving the health or safety of persons within the 623 preserve. 624 (4)âBABCOCK RANCH ADVISORY GROUP.â 625 (a)âThe purpose of the Babcock Ranch Advisory Group is to 626 assist the department by providing guidance and advice 627 concerning the management and stewardship of the Babcock Ranch 628 Preserve. 629 (b)âThe Babcock Ranch Advisory Group shall be comprised of 630 nine members appointed to 5-year terms. Based on recommendations 631 from the Governor and Cabinet, the commission, and the governing 632 boards of Charlotte County and Lee County, the commissioner 633 shall appoint members as follows: 634 1.âOne member with experience in sustainable management of 635 forest lands for commodity purposes. 636 2.âOne member with experience in financial management, 637 budget and program analysis, and small business operations. 638 3.âOne member with experience in management of game and 639 nongame wildlife and fish populations, including hunting, 640 fishing, and other recreational activities. 641 4.âOne member with experience in domesticated livestock 642 management, production, and marketing, including range 643 management and livestock business management. 644 5.âOne member with experience in agriculture operations or 645 forestry management. 646 6.âOne member with experience in hunting, fishing, nongame 647 species management, or wildlife habitat management, restoration, 648 and conservation. 649 7.âOne member with experience in public outreach and 650 education. 651 8.âOne member who is a resident of Lee County, to be 652 designated by the Board of County Commissioners of Lee County. 653 9.âOne member who is a resident of Charlotte County, to be 654 designated by the Board of County Commissioners of Charlotte 655 County. 656 657 Vacancies will be filled in the same manner in which the 658 original appointment was made. A member appointed to fill a 659 vacancy shall serve for the remainder of that term. 660 (c)âMembers of the Babcock Ranch Advisory Group shall: 661 1.âElect a chair and vice chair from among the group 662 members. 663 2.âMeet regularly as determined by the chair. 664 3.âServe without compensation but shall receive 665 reimbursement for travel and per diem expenses as provided in s. 666 112.061. 667 (4)(5)âMANAGEMENT OF PRESERVE; FEES.â 668 (a)âThe department shall assume all authority provided by 669 this section to manage and operate the preserve as a working 670 ranch upon the termination or expiration of the management 671 agreement attached as Exhibit âEâ to that certain agreement for 672 sale and purchase approved by the Board of Trustees of the 673 Internal Improvement Trust Fund on November 22, 2005, and by Lee 674 County on November 20, 2005. 675 (b)âUpon assuming management and operation of the preserve, 676 the department shall: 677 1.âManage and operate the preserve and the uses thereof, 678 including, but not limited to, the activities necessary to 679 administer and operate the preserve as a working ranch; the 680 activities necessary for the preservation and development of the 681 land and renewable surface resources of the preserve; the 682 activities necessary for interpretation of the history of the 683 preserve on behalf of the public; the activities necessary for 684 the management, public use, and occupancy of facilities and 685 lands within the preserve; and the maintenance, rehabilitation, 686 repair, and improvement of property within the preserve. 687 2.âDevelop programs and activities relating to the 688 management of the preserve as a working ranch. 689 3.âEstablish procedures for entering into lease agreements 690 and other agreements for the use and occupancy of the facilities 691 of the preserve. The procedures shall ensure reasonable 692 competition and set guidelines for determining reasonable fees, 693 terms, and conditions for such agreements. 694 4.âAssess reasonable fees for admission to, use of, and 695 occupancy of the preserve to offset costs of operating the 696 preserve as a working ranch. These fees are independent of fees 697 assessed by the commission for the privilege of hunting, 698 fishing, or pursuing outdoor recreational activities within the 699 preserve, and shall be deposited into the Incidental Trust Fund 700 of the Florida Forest Service, subject to appropriation by the 701 Legislature. 702 (c)âThe commission, in cooperation with the department, 703 shall: 704 1.âEstablish and implement public hunting and other fish 705 and wildlife management activities. Tier I and Tier II public 706 hunting opportunities shall be provided consistent with the 707 management plan and the recreation master plan. Tier I public 708 hunting shall provide hunting opportunities similar to those 709 offered on wildlife management areas with an emphasis on youth 710 and family-oriented hunts. Tier II public hunting shall be 711 provided specifically by fee-based permitting to ensure 712 compatibility with livestock grazing and other essential 713 agricultural operations on the preserve. 714 2.âEstablish and administer permit fees for Tier II public 715 hunting to capitalize on the value of hunting on portions of the 716 preserve and to help ensure the preserve is financially self 717 sufficient. The fees shall be deposited into the State Game 718 Trust Fund of the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission to 719 be used to offset the costs of providing public hunting and to 720 support fish and wildlife management and other land management 721 activities on the preserve. 722 (d)âThe Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust 723 Fund or its designated agent may: 724 1.âNegotiate directly with and enter into such agreements, 725 leases, contracts, and other arrangements with any person, firm, 726 association, organization, corporation, or governmental entity, 727 including entities of federal, state, and local governments, as 728 are necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes and 729 activities authorized by this section. 730 2.âGrant privileges, leases, concessions, and permits for 731 the use of land for the accommodation of visitors to the 732 preserve, provided no natural curiosities or objects of interest 733 shall be granted, leased, or rented on such terms as shall deny 734 or interfere with free access to them by the public. Such 735 grants, leases, and permits may be made and given without 736 advertisement or securing competitive bids. Such grants, leases, 737 or permits may not be assigned or transferred by any grantee 738 without consent of the Board of Trustees of the Internal 739 Improvement Trust Fund or its designated agent. 740 (5)(6)âDISSOLUTION OF BABCOCK RANCH, INC.âUpon dissolution 741 of the Babcock Ranch, Inc., all statutory powers, duties, 742 functions, records, personnel, property, and unexpended balances 743 of appropriations, allocations, and other funds of the 744 corporation shall be transferred to the Department of 745 Agriculture and Consumer Services unless otherwise provided by 746 law. Any cash balances of funds shall revert to the Incidental 747 Trust Fund of the Florida Forest Service. 748 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 749 287.1351, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (3) of 750 that section is republished, to read: 751 287.1351âSuspended vendors; state contracts.â 752 (2)(a)âA vendor that is in default on any contract with an 753 agency, has failed to timely compensate its subcontractors or 754 suppliers, or has otherwise repeatedly demonstrated a recent 755 inability to fulfill the terms and conditions of previous state 756 contracts or to adequately perform its duties under those 757 contracts may not submit a bid, proposal, or reply to an agency 758 or enter into or renew a contract to provide any goods or 759 services to an agency after its placement, pursuant to this 760 section, on the suspended vendor list. 761 (3)âAn agency shall notify the department of any vendor 762 that has met the grounds for suspension described in paragraph 763 (2)(a). The agency must provide documentation to the department 764 evidencing the vendorâs default or other grounds for suspension. 765 The department shall review the documentation provided and 766 determine whether good cause exists to remove the vendor from 767 the vendor list and to place it on the suspended vendor list. If 768 good cause exists, the department must notify the vendor in 769 writing of its intent to remove the vendor from the vendor list 770 and of the vendorâs right to an administrative hearing and the 771 applicable procedures and time requirements for any such 772 hearing. If the vendor does not request an administrative 773 hearing, the department must enter a final order removing the 774 vendor from the vendor list. A vendor may not be removed from 775 the vendor list without receiving an individual notice of intent 776 from the department. 777 Section 9.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (4) of 778 section 322.12, Florida Statutes, to read: 779 322.12âExamination of applicants.â 780 (4)âThe examination for an applicant for a commercial 781 driver license shall include a test of the applicantâs eyesight 782 given by a driver license examiner designated by the department 783 or by a licensed ophthalmologist, optometrist, or physician and 784 a test of the applicantâs hearing given by a driver license 785 examiner or a licensed physician. The examination shall also 786 include a test of the applicantâs ability to read and understand 787 highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; his or 788 her knowledge of the traffic laws of this state pertaining to 789 the class of motor vehicle which he or she is applying to be 790 licensed to operate, including laws regulating driving under the 791 influence of alcohol or controlled substances, driving with an 792 unlawful blood-alcohol level, and driving while intoxicated; his 793 or her knowledge of the effects of alcohol and controlled 794 substances and the dangers of driving a motor vehicle after 795 having consumed alcohol or controlled substances; and his or her 796 knowledge of any special skills, requirements, or precautions 797 necessary for the safe operation of the class of vehicle which 798 he or she is applying to be licensed to operate. In addition, 799 the examination shall include an actual demonstration of the 800 applicantâs ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control 801 in the safe operation of a motor vehicle or combination of 802 vehicles of the type covered by the license classification which 803 the applicant is seeking, including an examination of the 804 applicantâs ability to perform an inspection of his or her 805 vehicle. 806 (c)âAn applicant for a commercial driver license who 807 receives unauthorized assistance from another person in 808 completing the portion of the examination which tests the 809 applicantâs ability to read and understand highway signs 810 regulating, warning, and directing traffic or his or her 811 knowledge of the traffic laws of this state pertaining to the 812 class of motor vehicle for which he or she is applying to be 813 licensed to operate, including laws regulating driving under the 814 influence of alcohol or controlled substances, driving with an 815 unlawful blood-alcohol level, and driving while intoxicated, 816 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 817 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 818 Section 10.âSection 322.36, Florida Statutes, is amended to 819 read: 820 322.36âPermitting unauthorized operator to drive.â 821 (1)âA person may not authorize or knowingly permit a motor 822 vehicle owned by him or her or under his or her dominion or 823 control to be operated upon any highway or public street except 824 by a person who is duly authorized to operate a motor vehicle 825 under this chapter. 826 (2)âA person may not knowingly or willfully provide 827 unauthorized assistance to an applicant for the examination 828 required to hold a commercial driver license pursuant to s. 829 322.12(4). 830 (3)âA Any person who violates this section commits a 831 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 832 775.082 or s. 775.083. If a person violates this section by 833 knowingly loaning a vehicle to a person whose driver license is 834 suspended and if that vehicle is involved in an accident 835 resulting in bodily injury or death, the driver license of the 836 person violating this section must shall be suspended for 1 837 year. 838 Section 11.âSection 377.71, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 839 Section 12.âSection 377.711, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 840 Section 13.âSection 377.712, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 841 Section 14.âPresent paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 842 (3) of section 403.0855, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 843 paragraphs (b) and (c), respectively, a new paragraph (a) is 844 added to that subsection, and subsections (2) and (4) of that 845 section are amended, to read: 846 403.0855âBiosolids management.â 847 (2)âThe department shall adopt rules for biosolids 848 management. Rules adopted by the department pursuant to this 849 section may not take effect until ratified by the Legislature. 850 (3)âFor a new land application site permit or a permit 851 renewal issued after July 1, 2020, the permittee of a biosolids 852 land application site shall: 853 (a)âEnsure that only Class AA biosolids are applied to the 854 soil. 855 (4)(a)âAll permits shall comply with the requirements of 856 paragraph (3)(a) subsection (3) by July 1, 2028 2022. 857 (b)âLocal governments that do not transport biosolids for 858 land application outside of their respective county boundaries 859 shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (3)(a) by July 860 1, 2031. This paragraph may not be construed to prohibit the 861 transportation of Class B biosolids by a local government 862 outside of its boundaries to a Class AA biosolids treatment 863 facility or waste-to-energy facility located within the 864 boundaries of another local government. 865 Section 15.âPresent subsection (5) of section 482.071, 866 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (6), and a new 867 subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 868 482.071âLicenses.â 869 (5)âEach person applying for a pest control business 870 license or renewal thereof who will offer and perform 871 fumigations as a part of his or her regular business operations 872 must furnish to the department a certificate of insurance that 873 meets the requirement for minimum financial responsibility for 874 bodily injury and property damage, consisting of: 875 (a)âBodily injury coverage of $1 million per person and $2 876 million per occurrence; and property damage coverage of $1 877 million per occurrence and $2 million in the aggregate; or 878 (b)âCombined single-limit coverage of $2 million in the 879 aggregate. 880 Section 16.âSubsection (7) of section 482.161, Florida 881 Statutes, is amended to read: 882 482.161âDisciplinary grounds and actions; reinstatement.â 883 (7)âThe department, pursuant to chapter 120, in addition to 884 or in lieu of any other remedy provided by state or local law, 885 may impose an administrative fine in the Class III II category 886 pursuant to s. 570.971 for a violation of this chapter or of the 887 rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. In determining the 888 amount of fine to be levied for a violation, the following 889 factors shall be considered: 890 (a)âThe severity of the violation, including the 891 probability that the death, or serious harm to the health or 892 safety, of any person will result or has resulted; the severity 893 of the actual or potential harm; and the extent to which this 894 chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter were 895 violated; 896 (b)âAny actions taken by the licensee or certified operator 897 in charge, or limited certificateholder, to correct the 898 violation or to remedy complaints; 899 (c)âAny previous violations of this chapter or of the rules 900 adopted pursuant to this chapter; and 901 (d)âThe cost to the department of investigating the 902 violation. 903 Section 17.âSubsections (3) and (5) of section 482.165, 904 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 905 482.165âUnlicensed practice of pest control; cease and 906 desist order; injunction; civil suit and penalty.â 907 (3)âIn addition to or in lieu of any remedy provided under 908 subsection (2), the department may institute a civil suit in 909 circuit court to recover a civil penalty for any violation for 910 which the department may issue a notice to cease and desist 911 under subsection (2). The civil penalty shall be in the Class 912 III II category pursuant to s. 570.971 for each offense. The 913 court may also award to the prevailing party court costs and 914 reasonable attorney fees. 915 (5)âIn addition to or in lieu of any remedy provided under 916 subsections (2) and (3), the department may, even in the case of 917 a first offense, impose a fine not less than twice the cost of a 918 pest control business license, but not more than a fine in the 919 Class III II category pursuant to s. 570.971, upon a 920 determination by the department that a person is in violation of 921 subsection (1). For the purposes of this subsection, the lapse 922 of a previously issued license for a period of less than 1 year 923 is not considered a violation. 924 Section 18.âSubsections (20) and (21) are added to section 925 489.105, Florida Statutes, to read: 926 489.105âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 927 (20)ââSubcontractorâ has the same meaning as in s. 558.002. 928 (21)ââSupplierâ has the same meaning as in s. 558.002. 929 Section 19.âSection 489.1295, Florida Statutes, is created 930 to read: 931 489.1295âProhibition against nonpayment.â 932 (1)âA licensed contractor must compensate a subcontractor 933 or supplier, unless there is a bona fide dispute regarding the 934 amount due, if any, for services, labor, or materials: 935 (a)âWithin 45 days after receiving payment for the services 936 performed or materials supplied by the subcontractor or 937 supplier; or 938 (b)âIn accordance with the terms of the contract for such 939 services, labor, or materials. 940 (2)âA licensed contractor who knowingly or willfully 941 violates this section is subject to disciplinary proceedings as 942 provided in s. 489.129. 943 Section 20.âSubsection (6) of section 500.04, Florida 944 Statutes, is amended to read: 945 500.04âProhibited acts.âThe following acts and the causing 946 thereof within the state are prohibited: 947 (6)âThe obstruction of or refusal to permit entry or 948 inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample, as authorized 949 by s. 500.147. 950 Section 21.âSection 500.81, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 951 Section 22.âSubsection (5) of section 500.93, Florida 952 Statutes, is amended to read: 953 500.93âMislabeling of plant-based products as milk, meat, 954 or poultry.â 955 (5)âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 956 shall notify the Division of Law Revision upon the enactment 957 into law by any 11 of the group of 14 states composed of 958 Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Kentucky, Louisiana, 959 Maryland, Mississippi, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Tennessee, 960 Texas, Virginia, and West Virginia of the mandatory labeling 961 requirements pursuant to paragraphs (2)(a), (3)(a), and (4)(a) 962 subsections (2) and (3). 963 Section 23.âSection 501.013, Florida Statutes, is amended 964 to read: 965 501.013âHealth studios; exemptions.â 966 (1)âThe following businesses or activities may be declared 967 exempt from the provisions of ss. 501.012-501.019 upon the 968 filing of an affidavit with the department establishing that the 969 stated qualifications are met: 970 (a)(1)âA bona fide nonprofit organization which has been 971 granted tax-exempt status by the Internal Revenue Service. 972 (b)(2)âA gymnastics school which engages only in 973 instruction and training and in which exercise is only 974 incidental to such instruction and training. 975 (c)(3)âA golf, tennis, or racquetball club in which sports 976 play is the only activity offered by the club. If the facility 977 offers the use of physical exercise equipment, this exemption 978 shall not apply. 979 (d)(4)âA program or facility which is offered and used 980 solely for the purpose of dance, aerobic exercise, or martial 981 arts, and which utilizes no physical exercise equipment. 982 (e)(5)âA country club that has as its primary function the 983 provision of a social life and recreational amenities to its 984 members, and for which a program of physical exercise is merely 985 incidental to membership. As used in this paragraph subsection, 986 the term âcountry clubâ means a facility that offers its members 987 a variety of services that may include, but need not be limited 988 to, social activities; dining, banquet, catering, and lounge 989 facilities; swimming; yachting; golf; tennis; card games such as 990 bridge and canasta; and special programs for membersâ children. 991 Upon the filing of an affidavit with the department establishing 992 that the stated qualifications of this paragraph subsection were 993 met before July 1, 1997, this paragraph subsection will apply 994 retroactively to the date that the country club met these 995 qualifications. 996 (f)(6)âA program or facility that is offered by an 997 organization for the exclusive use of its employees and their 998 family members. 999 (2)âIn addition to the businesses and activities listed in 1000 subsection (1), the department may exempt any other business or 1001 activity not in existence as of July 1, 2026, from ss. 501.012 1002 501.019. 1003 Section 24.âSection 501.062, Florida Statutes, is created 1004 to read: 1005 501.062âUnauthorized commercial solicitation; legislative 1006 intent; definitions; prohibited acts; penalties.â 1007 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âIt is the intent of the Legislature 1008 to protect, preserve, and promote the safety, welfare, and peace 1009 of the citizens of this state by adopting measures to reduce the 1010 threat to private property rights, including the right to 1011 exclude and to be free from trespass of unauthorized commercial 1012 solicitation on private property when noticed by the property 1013 owner. It is the intent of this section to protect such private 1014 property rights by creating a uniform standard for notifying 1015 individuals or groups of individuals that commercial 1016 solicitation is prohibited on private property. 1017 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1018 (a)ââCommercial solicitationâ means the act of attempting 1019 to sell goods or services, or to raise funds for a commercial 1020 purpose, through direct or indirect contact with individuals, 1021 including, but not limited to, using words, body gestures, or 1022 signs, on behalf of a business or commercial entity. 1023 (b)ââDwellingâ has the same meaning as in s. 810.011(2). 1024 (3)âPROHIBITED ACTS.âA person may not engage in commercial 1025 solicitation on any dwelling that clearly and prominently 1026 displays a sign that is no less than 8.5 by 11 inches, is 1027 visible to any person approaching the dwelling, and clearly 1028 displays a statement which identifies the dwelling as private 1029 property on which commercial solicitation is prohibited, in 1030 substantially the following manner with letters at least 1 inch 1031 in height: 1032 1033 THIS DWELLING IS DESIGNATED PRIVATE PROPERTY. NO 1034 COMMERCIAL SOLICITATION IS PERMITTED PURSUANT TO 1035 SECTION 501.062, FLORIDA STATUTES. 1036 1037 (4)âPENALTIES.âA person who violates subsection (3) commits 1038 a noncriminal violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.083. A 1039 person who commits a second or subsequent violation commits a 1040 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 1041 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1042 Section 25.âSubsection (50) is added to section 570.07, 1043 Florida Statutes, to read: 1044 570.07âDepartment of Agriculture and Consumer Services; 1045 functions, powers, and duties.âThe department shall have and 1046 exercise the following functions, powers, and duties: 1047 (50)âNotwithstanding s. 20.04(7), to reorganize 1048 departmental units upon the approval of the commissioner. 1049 Section 26.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (3) of 1050 section 570.822, Florida Statutes, to read: 1051 570.822âAgriculture and Aquaculture Producers Emergency 1052 Recovery Loan Program.â 1053 (3)âELIGIBLE APPLICANTS.âTo be eligible for the program, an 1054 applicant must: 1055 (c)âBe a United States citizen and a legal resident of this 1056 state before or on the date of the declared emergency. If the 1057 applicant is an entity as defined in s. 605.0102, the entity 1058 must be wholly owned and operated in the United States and 1059 possess an active certificate of status issued by the Department 1060 of State pursuant to chapter 605. 1061 Section 27.âSection 570.832, Florida Statutes, is created 1062 to read: 1063 570.832âFlorida Native Seed Research and Marketing 1064 Program.âThe Florida Wildflower Foundation, Inc., in 1065 coordination with the department, shall, subject to 1066 appropriation, establish the Florida Native Seed Research and 1067 Marketing Program to conduct research designed to expand the 1068 availability and uses of native seeds and strengthen the market 1069 position of this stateâs native seed industry through marketing 1070 campaigns and promotions in this state and across the nation. 1071 Section 28.âSection 570.846, Florida Statutes, is created 1072 to read: 1073 570.846âFlorida Food Animal and Equine Veterinary Medicine 1074 Loan Repayment Program.â 1075 (1)Â PURPOSE.âTo encourage specialized and qualified 1076 veterinary professionals to practice in this state, to retain 1077 the employment of such professionals in this state, and to 1078 promote the care and treatment of food animals and equine 1079 animals, there is established the Florida Food Animal and Equine 1080 Veterinary Medicine Loan Repayment Program. The purpose of the 1081 program is to authorize the department to make payments that 1082 offset loans incurred, for up to three new eligible candidates 1083 annually, for studies leading to a veterinary degree with a 1084 specialization in food animal or equine veterinary medicine. 1085 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1086 (a)ââEquineâ means a species of animal belonging to the 1087 taxonomic family equidae, which includes horses and donkeys. 1088 (b)ââFood animalâ means a species of animal raised for the 1089 human food supply. Food animals include cattle, swine, sheep, 1090 goat, poultry, aquaculture, and apiary species. 1091 (c)ââFood animal and equine animal veterinary medicineâ 1092 means a veterinary medical practice that encompasses medical 1093 care, disease prevention, and consultation on the feeding, 1094 housing, and overall flock, herd, or equine health management. 1095 (d)ââFood animal or equine veterinarianâ means a 1096 veterinarian working in food and equine animal veterinary 1097 medicine who focuses on the management and health of such 1098 animals and who spends a minimum of 20 hours per week on food 1099 animal species or equine animal species care and treatment. 1100 (3)âELIGIBILITY.âTo be eligible for the program, a 1101 candidate must have graduated from an American Veterinary 1102 Medical Association-accredited college of veterinary medicine, 1103 have received a Florida veterinary medical license, have 1104 obtained a Category II Accreditation from the United States 1105 Department of Agriculture, and be a practicing food animal or 1106 equine animal veterinarian in this state. 1107 (4)âFUNDING.âSubject to legislative appropriation, the 1108 department may make loan principal repayments of up to $25,000 1109 per eligible candidate per year. Loan principal repayments may 1110 be made on behalf of each eligible candidate each year for up to 1111 5 years. The department may select up to three new eligible 1112 candidates each year. All repayments are contingent upon 1113 continued proof of employment in this state as a practicing food 1114 animal or equine animal veterinarian. 1115 (5)âDUPLICATION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.âAn eligible 1116 candidate receiving financial assistance from the federal 1117 veterinary medicine loan repayment program as established in 7 1118 U.S.C. part 3151a is ineligible to receive financial assistance 1119 from the program under this section. 1120 (6)âRULEMAKING.âThe department may adopt any rule necessary 1121 for the administration of the program. 1122 Section 29.âSubsection (1) of section 570.85, Florida 1123 Statutes, is amended to read: 1124 570.85âAgritourism.â 1125 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to promote 1126 agritourism as a way to support bona fide agricultural 1127 production by providing a stream of revenue and by educating the 1128 general public about the agricultural industry. It is also the 1129 intent of the Legislature to eliminate duplication of regulatory 1130 authority over agritourism as expressed in this section. Except 1131 as otherwise provided for in this section, and notwithstanding 1132 any other law, a local government may not adopt or enforce a 1133 local ordinance, regulation, rule, or policy that prohibits, 1134 restricts, regulates, or otherwise limits an agritourism 1135 activity on land classified as agricultural land under s. 1136 193.461, and may not require a property owner to obtain a rural 1137 event venue permit or license. This subsection does not limit 1138 the powers and duties of a local government to address 1139 substantial offsite impacts of agritourism activities or an 1140 emergency as provided in chapter 252. 1141 Section 30.âSubsection (6) is added to section 570.86, 1142 Florida Statutes, to read: 1143 570.86âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 570.85-570.89, the term: 1144 (6)ââRural event venueâ means a venue located on property 1145 classified as agricultural pursuant to s. 193.461 and used for 1146 special functions, such as weddings, receptions, corporate 1147 meetings, or similar gatherings. 1148 Section 31.âSubsection (7) of section 573.112, Florida 1149 Statutes, is amended to read: 1150 573.112âAdvisory council.â 1151 (7)âNotwithstanding any provision of this section, the 1152 Citrus Research and Field Trial Development Foundation, Inc., a 1153 direct-support organization of the Department of Agriculture and 1154 Consumer Services University of Florida established pursuant to 1155 s. 570.691 s. 1004.28, shall serve as the advisory council for a 1156 citrus research marketing order, provide the department with 1157 advice on administering the order, and, in accordance with the 1158 order, conduct citrus research and perform other duties assigned 1159 by the department. Notwithstanding s. 570.691 s. 1004.28(3) or 1160 any provision of this section, the foundationâs board of 1161 directors shall be composed of the Florida State Plant Health 1162 Inspection Service Director and, appointed by the Commissioner 1163 of Agriculture, 7 members who are 13 members, including 10 1164 citrus growers, 2 representatives of the universityâs Institute 1165 of Food and Agricultural Sciences, and 1 member who is a Florida 1166 citrus nursery representative. Members of the board of directors 1167 shall serve without compensation but appointed by the 1168 Commissioner of Agriculture, who are each entitled to 1169 reimbursement from the foundation for per diem and travel 1170 expenses as provided in s. 112.061. 1171 Section 32.âSubsection (32) of section 581.031, Florida 1172 Statutes, is amended to read: 1173 581.031âDepartment; powers and duties.âThe department has 1174 the following powers and duties: 1175 (32)âTo conduct or cause to be conducted research projects, 1176 including, but not limited to, citrus canker and citrus 1177 greening, which are recommended by the Citrus Research and Field 1178 Trial Development Foundation, Inc., within the limits of 1179 appropriations made specifically for such purpose. 1180 Section 33.âSubsection (4) of section 583.01, Florida 1181 Statutes, is amended to read: 1182 583.01âDefinitions.âFor the purpose of this chapter, unless 1183 elsewhere indicated, the term: 1184 (4)ââDealerâ means a person, firm, or corporation, 1185 including a producer, processor, retailer, or wholesaler, that 1186 sells, offers for sale, or holds for the purpose of sale in this 1187 state 30 dozen or more eggs or its equivalent in any one week, 1188 or more than 20,000 384 dressed birds annually in any one week. 1189 Section 34.âSection 590.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1190 read: 1191 590.02âFlorida Forest Service; powers, authority, and 1192 duties; liability; building structures; Withlacoochee and Welaka 1193 Training Centers Center.â 1194 (1)âThe Florida Forest Service has the following powers, 1195 authority, and duties to: 1196 (a)âEnforce the provisions of this chapter; 1197 (b)âPrevent, detect, and suppress wildfires wherever they 1198 may occur on public or private land in this state and do all 1199 things necessary in the exercise of such powers, authority, and 1200 duties; 1201 (c)âProvide firefighting crews, who shall be under the 1202 control and direction of the Florida Forest Service and its 1203 designated agents; 1204 (d)âAppoint center managers, forest area supervisors, 1205 forestry program administrators, a forest protection bureau 1206 chief, a forest protection assistant bureau chief, a field 1207 operations bureau chief, deputy chiefs of field operations, 1208 district managers, forest operations administrators, senior 1209 forest rangers, investigators, forest rangers, firefighter 1210 rotorcraft pilots, and other employees who may, at the Florida 1211 Forest Serviceâs discretion, be certified as forestry 1212 firefighters pursuant to s. 633.408(8). Other law 1213 notwithstanding, center managers, district managers, forest 1214 protection assistant bureau chief, and deputy chiefs of field 1215 operations have Selected Exempt Service status in the state 1216 personnel designation; 1217 (e)âDevelop a training curriculum for wildland firefighters 1218 which must contain a minimum of 40 hours of structural 1219 firefighter training, a minimum of 40 hours of emergency medical 1220 training, and a minimum of 376 hours of wildfire training; 1221 (f)âPay the cost of the initial commercial driver license 1222 examination fee, and renewal for those employees whose position 1223 requires them to operate equipment requiring a license. This 1224 paragraph is intended to be an authorization to the department 1225 to pay such costs, not an obligation; 1226 (g)âProvide fire management services and emergency response 1227 assistance and set and charge reasonable fees for performance of 1228 those services. Moneys collected from such fees shall be 1229 deposited into the Incidental Trust Fund of the Florida Forest 1230 Service; 1231 (h)âRequire all state, regional, and local government 1232 agencies operating aircraft in the vicinity of an ongoing 1233 wildfire to operate in compliance with the applicable state 1234 Wildfire Aviation Plan; 1235 (i)âAuthorize broadcast burning, prescribed burning, pile 1236 burning, and land clearing debris burning to carry out the 1237 duties of this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder; and 1238 (j)âMake rules to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. 1239 (2)âThe Florida Forest Serviceâs employees, and the 1240 firefighting crews under their control and direction, may enter 1241 upon any lands for the purpose of preventing, detecting, and 1242 suppressing wildfires and investigating smoke complaints or open 1243 burning not in compliance with authorization and to enforce the 1244 provisions of this chapter. 1245 (3)âEmployees of the Florida Forest Service and of federal, 1246 state, and local agencies, and all other persons and entities 1247 that are under contract or agreement with the Florida Forest 1248 Service to assist in firefighting operations as well as those 1249 entities, called upon by the Florida Forest Service to assist in 1250 firefighting may, in the performance of their duties, set 1251 counterfires, remove fences and other obstacles, dig trenches, 1252 cut firelines, use water from public and private sources, and 1253 carry on all other customary activities in the fighting of 1254 wildfires without incurring liability to any person or entity. 1255 The manner in which the Florida Forest Service monitors a 1256 smoldering wildfire or smoldering prescribed fire or fights any 1257 wildfire are planning level activities for which sovereign 1258 immunity applies and is not waived. 1259 (4)(a)âThe department may build structures, notwithstanding 1260 chapters 216 and 255, not to exceed a cost of $50,000 per 1261 structure from existing resources on forest lands, federal 1262 excess property, and unneeded existing structures. These 1263 structures must meet all applicable building codes. 1264 (b)âNotwithstanding s. 553.80(1), the department shall 1265 exclusively enforce the Florida Building Code as it pertains to 1266 wildfire, law enforcement, and other Florida Forest Service 1267 facilities under the jurisdiction of the department. 1268 (5)âThe Florida Forest Service shall organize its 1269 operational units to most effectively prevent, detect, and 1270 suppress wildfires, and to that end, may employ the necessary 1271 personnel to manage its activities in each unit. The Florida 1272 Forest Service may construct lookout towers, roads, bridges, 1273 firelines, and other facilities and may purchase or fabricate 1274 tools, supplies, and equipment for firefighting. The Florida 1275 Forest Service may reimburse the public and private entities 1276 that it engages to assist in the suppression of wildfires for 1277 their personnel and equipment, including aircraft. 1278 (6)âThe Florida Forest Service shall undertake 1279 privatization alternatives for fire prevention activities 1280 including constructing fire lines and conducting prescribed 1281 burns and, where appropriate, entering into agreements or 1282 contracts with the private sector to perform such activities. 1283 (7)âThe Florida Forest Service may organize, staff, equip, 1284 and operate the Withlacoochee and Welaka Training Centers 1285 Center. The centers center shall serve as sites a site where 1286 fire and forest resource managers can obtain current knowledge, 1287 techniques, skills, and theory as they relate to their 1288 respective disciplines, and the centers:. 1289 (a)âThe center May establish cooperative efforts involving 1290 federal, state, and local entities; hire appropriate personnel; 1291 and engage others by contract or agreement with or without 1292 compensation to assist in carrying out the training and 1293 operations of the centers center. 1294 (b)âThe center Shall provide wildfire suppression training 1295 opportunities for rural fire departments, volunteer fire 1296 departments, and other local fire response units. 1297 (c)âThe center Shall focus on curriculum related to, but 1298 not limited to, fuel reduction, an incident management system, 1299 prescribed burning certification, multiple-use land management, 1300 water quality, forest health, environmental education, and 1301 wildfire suppression training for structural firefighters. 1302 (d)âThe center May assess appropriate fees for food, 1303 lodging, travel, course materials, and supplies in order to meet 1304 their its operational costs and may grant free meals, room, and 1305 scholarships to persons and other entities as determined by the 1306 Florida Forest Service, regardless of whether training occurs at 1307 the Withlacoochee Training Center or Welaka Training Center or 1308 at another location in exchange for instructional assistance. 1309 (8)(a)âThe Cross City Work Center shall be named the L. 1310 Earl Peterson Forestry Station. This is to honor Mr. L. Earl 1311 Peterson, Floridaâs sixth state forester, whose distinguished 1312 career in state government has spanned 44 years, and who is a 1313 native of Dixie County. 1314 (b)âThe Madison Forestry Station shall be named the Harvey 1315 Greene Sr. Forestry Station. This is to honor Mr. Harvey Greene 1316 Sr., a World War I veteran and pioneer in forestry in Madison 1317 County. In 1947, Mr. Harvey Greene Sr. offered to give the land 1318 on which the forestry station is located to the state; however, 1319 at that time, the state could not accept donations of land. 1320 Instead, Mr. Harvey Greene Sr. sold the land to the state and, 1321 with the proceeds of the sale, purchased forestry equipment to 1322 be used by the citizens of Madison County to plant trees and 1323 fight wildfires. 1324 (c)âThe Bonifay Forestry Station shall be named the John 1325 Michael Mathis Forestry Station. This is to honor the late Mr. 1326 John Michael Mathis, the Chipola Forestry Center manager whose 1327 distinguished career spanned 18 years, and who received many 1328 awards for his service, including commendation for leadership in 1329 wildfire mitigation for his service during Hurricane Michael. 1330 Mr. John Michael Mathis was a proud husband, father, forester, 1331 and friend. 1332 (9)(a)âNotwithstanding ss. 273.055 and 287.16, the 1333 department may retain, transfer, warehouse, bid, destroy, scrap, 1334 or otherwise dispose of surplus equipment and vehicles that are 1335 used for wildland firefighting. 1336 (b)âAll money received from the disposition of state-owned 1337 equipment and vehicles that are used for wildland firefighting 1338 shall be retained by the department. Money received pursuant to 1339 this section is appropriated for and may be disbursed for the 1340 acquisition of exchange and surplus equipment used for wildland 1341 firefighting, and for all necessary operating expenditures 1342 related to such equipment, in the same fiscal year and the 1343 fiscal year following the disposition. The department shall 1344 maintain records of the accounts into which the money is 1345 deposited. 1346 (10)(a)âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 252.38, the 1347 Florida Forest Service has exclusive authority to require and 1348 issue authorizations for broadcast burning and agricultural and 1349 silvicultural pile burning. An agency, commission, department, 1350 county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the 1351 state may not adopt or enforce laws, regulations, rules, or 1352 policies pertaining to broadcast burning or agricultural and 1353 silvicultural pile burning. 1354 (b)âThe Florida Forest Service may delegate to a county, 1355 municipality, or special district its authority: 1356 1.âAs delegated by the Department of Environmental 1357 Protection pursuant to ss. 403.061(29) and 403.081, to manage 1358 and enforce regulations pertaining to the burning of yard trash 1359 in accordance with s. 590.125(6). 1360 2.âTo manage the open burning of land clearing debris in 1361 accordance with s. 590.125. 1362 Section 35.âSection 595.421, Florida Statutes, is created 1363 to read: 1364 595.421âFarmers Feeding Florida Program.âThere is 1365 established the Farmers Feeding Florida Program to coordinate 1366 with Feeding Florida, or its successor entity, for the 1367 acquisition, transportation, and distribution of non-Emergency 1368 Food Assistance Program fresh food products for the benefit of 1369 residents who are food insecure due to a lack of local food 1370 resources, accessibility, and affordability. 1371 (1)âIn order to implement the program, Feeding Florida 1372 shall: 1373 (a)âEnter into an agreement with the department to provide, 1374 at a minimum, all of the following services: 1375 1.âTransportation of non-Emergency Food Assistance Program 1376 fresh food products using owned vehicles or contracted 1377 commercial vehicles. 1378 2.âCoordination of the purchase and pickup of food from the 1379 purchase location and delivery to the distribution location. 1380 (b)âSubmit monthly reports to the department, beginning 1381 July 1, 2026, which include, at a minimum, all of the following: 1382 1.âA detailed record of the amount of food purchased, 1383 measured per pound and itemized according to its commodity type. 1384 2.âFood purchase locations. 1385 3.âFood purchase dates. 1386 4.âThe date of delivery and locations to which the food was 1387 distributed. 1388 (c)âSubmit quarterly reports, beginning July 1, 2026, to 1389 the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees, 1390 including all of the following information: 1391 1.âA detailed record of the amount of food distributed, 1392 measured per pound and itemized according to its commodity type. 1393 2.âThe distribution locations. 1394 3.âAn itemized list of the types of commodities 1395 distributed. 1396 (2)âFoods purchased by Feeding Florida through the program 1397 are restricted to charitable purposes for hunger relief and may 1398 not reenter the wholesale, retail, or secondary market. 1399 (3)âFeeding Florida may not, in implementing this section, 1400 allow a candidate for elective office to host a food 1401 distribution event during the period of time between the last 1402 day of the election qualifying period and the date of the 1403 election if the candidate is opposed for election or reelection 1404 at the time of the event. This subsection does not apply if the 1405 event is in response to a declared state of emergency. 1406 Section 36.âPresent paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of 1407 section 597.004, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 1408 (d) and amended, a new paragraph (c) is added to that 1409 subsection, and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of that section 1410 is amended, to read: 1411 597.004âAquaculture certificate of registration.â 1412 (2)âRULES.â 1413 (a)âThe department, in consultation with the Department of 1414 Environmental Protection, the water management districts, 1415 environmental groups, and representatives from the affected 1416 farming groups, shall adopt rules to: 1417 1.âSpecify the requirement of best management practices to 1418 be implemented by holders of aquaculture certificates of 1419 registration. 1420 2.âEstablish procedures for holders of aquaculture 1421 certificates of registration to submit the notice of intent to 1422 comply with best management practices. 1423 3.âEstablish schedules for implementation of best 1424 management practices, and of interim measures that can be taken 1425 prior to adoption of best management practices. Interim measures 1426 may include the continuation of regulatory requirements in 1427 effect on June 30, 1998. 1428 4.âEstablish a system to assure the implementation of best 1429 management practices, including recordkeeping requirements. 1430 5.âRequire any facility that cultures Micropterus salmoides 1431 floridanus to maintain stock acquisition documentation or 1432 records of genetic testing. 1433 (7)âREGISTRATION AND RENEWALS.â 1434 (c)âThe department may not renew a certificate of 1435 registration for a facility that is not compliant with this 1436 section unless documentation of corrective action is provided 1437 with the renewal application. 1438 (d)(c)âA Any person whose certificate of registration has 1439 been revoked or suspended must reapply to the department for 1440 certification. A person, a company, or an entity, or a principal 1441 of a company or an entity whose certificate of registration has 1442 been revoked, may not reapply for a period of 3 years. 1443 Section 37.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 1444 597.010, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1445 597.010âShellfish regulation; leases.â 1446 (5)âLEASES IN PERPETUITY; RENT.â 1447 (a)âAll leases issued previously under the provisions of s. 1448 379.2525 shall be enforced under the authority of this chapter, 1449 notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, and shall 1450 continue in perpetuity under such restrictions as stated in the 1451 lease agreement. The annual rental fee charged for all leases 1452 shall consist of the minimum rate of $15 per acre, or any 1453 fraction of an acre, per year and may shall be adjusted on 1454 January 1, 1995, and every 5 years thereafter, based on the 5 1455 year average change in the Consumer Price Index. Rent must shall 1456 be paid in advance of January 1 of each year or, in the case of 1457 a new lease, at the time of signing, regardless of who holds the 1458 lease. 1459 Section 38.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of 1460 section 599.012, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1461 599.012âFlorida Wine Trust Fund; creation.â 1462 (1)âThere is established the Florida Wine Trust Fund within 1463 the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The 1464 department shall use the moneys deposited in the trust fund 1465 pursuant to subsection (2) to do all the following: 1466 (b)âPromote wine viticulture products manufactured from 1467 products grown in the state. 1468 (c)âProvide grants for wine and viticultural research. 1469 Section 39.âSubsection (3) of section 601.13, Florida 1470 Statutes, is amended to read: 1471 601.13âCitrus research; administration by Department of 1472 Citrus; appropriation.â 1473 (3)âAn entity that solicits research proposals and awards 1474 funding for those proposals expending funds received from the 1475 State Treasury on citrus production research conducted pursuant 1476 to chapter 573, as recommended by the Citrus Research and Field 1477 Trial Development Foundation, Inc., or conducted through 1478 contract with the department shall deliver a report that 1479 includes all of the following information to the commission 1480 biannually and at the request of the commission: 1481 (a)âProject plans selected for funding. 1482 (b)âThe financial status of the projects. 1483 (c)âCurrent findings of the funded research. 1484 (d)âAvailability of citrus products or application of 1485 growersâ practices found through funded research. 1486 (e)âThe status of the commercialization process of such 1487 products or practices. 1488 Section 40.âSection 616.001, Florida Statutes, is amended 1489 to read: 1490 616.001âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 1491 (1)ââAnnual public fairâ means a community, county, 1492 district, regional, or state fair that is held and conducted by 1493 a fair association and permitted by the department pursuant to 1494 s. 616.15. 1495 (2)ââAuthorityâ means the Florida State Fair Authority. 1496 (3)ââCommunity fairâ means an annual public fair that 1497 serves an area of less than an entire county, has exhibits that 1498 are in accordance with s. 616.17, and gives premiums or awards 1499 to exhibitors. Agricultural products shall be produced in the 1500 community the exhibit represents. The majority of the board of 1501 directors of the fair shall reside, be employed, or operate a 1502 business in the community the fair represents. 1503 (4)ââConcessionâ means use by a fair association, or a 1504 grant, lease, or license to a third party, of a portion of the 1505 land under the ownership, custody, or control of a fair 1506 association for specific uses, or the right to enter upon the 1507 land for specific purposes, such as providing rides, games, 1508 food, beverage, merchandise for sale, exhibits, projects, 1509 activities, events, programs, or other uses authorized in this 1510 chapter. 1511 (5)ââCounty fairâ means an annual public fair that serves 1512 an entire county and provides exhibitors with premiums or awards 1513 for exhibits that are in accordance with s. 616.17. Agricultural 1514 products must be typical of those produced in the county the 1515 exhibit represents. The majority of the board of directors of 1516 the fair shall reside, be employed, or operate a business in the 1517 county that the fair association represents. 1518 (4)(6)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and 1519 Consumer Services. 1520 (7)ââDistrict fairâ means an annual public fair that serves 1521 at least five counties and has exhibits that meet the 1522 requirements of s. 616.17. A district fair shall pay at least 1523 $25,000 in cash premiums or awards to exhibitors. Agricultural 1524 products must be typical of those produced in the counties the 1525 exhibit represents. Livestock may originate from outside the 1526 district, but must be registered in the exhibitorâs name at 1527 least 30 days before the opening day of the fair. Each county is 1528 encouraged to have proportionate exhibits, typical of its 1529 respective natural resources. Each county shall have exhibits 1530 representing basic resources in agriculture and industry. 1531 (5)(8)ââEntryâ means one item entered for competition or 1532 show. An entry may constitute an exhibit, depending upon the 1533 regulations stated in the premium book. 1534 (6)(9)ââExhibitâ means one or more entries entered for 1535 exhibition and constituting a unit. An exhibit may consist of 1536 one or more entries, depending upon the regulations stated in 1537 the premium book. The term includes parades and displays of 1538 articles or a collection of articles, whether static, 1539 interactive, or dynamic, by a fair association or a third party 1540 contracting with a fair association, such as exhibits of 1541 animals, art, housewares, or motor vehicles. 1542 (7)(10)ââExhibitorâ means an individual, a group of 1543 individuals, or a business, including a fair association or 1544 third party contracting with a fair association, which has an 1545 exhibit. 1546 (8)(11)ââFair associationâ or âassociationâ means an 1547 association not for profit incorporated under this chapter for 1548 the purpose of conducting and operating public fairs or 1549 expositions. 1550 (9)(12)ââPublic fair or expositionâ means a project, 1551 activity, event, or program, and use by a fair association, 1552 including, but not limited to, the annual public fair, which 1553 serves the purposes specified in s. 616.08 and benefits and 1554 develops the educational, agricultural, horticultural, 1555 livestock, charitable, historical, civic, cultural, scientific, 1556 and other resources of this state, or any county, municipality, 1557 or other community in this state. 1558 (13)ââRegional fairâ or âinterstate fairâ means an annual 1559 public fair of this state and other states in which fair 1560 exhibits meet the requirements of s. 616.17. Agricultural 1561 products must be typical of those produced in the area the 1562 exhibit represents. 1563 (10)(14)ââSpecialized showâ means a show or an exhibition 1564 exhibiting and emphasizing livestock or poultry, or a fruit or 1565 vegetable festival, and must meet the minimum exhibit 1566 requirements specified in s. 616.17. A specialized show may 1567 qualify under one of the definitions in subsections (3), (5), 1568 (7), and (15). 1569 (11)(15)ââState fairâ means an annual public fair that 1570 serves the entire state. Exhibits must comply with s. 616.17, 1571 and cash premiums or awards may be given to exhibitors. 1572 Section 41.âSection 616.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1573 read: 1574 616.01âRequirements for Number of persons required; 1575 requisites of proposed charter.âTwenty-five or more persons who 1576 are Residents and qualified electors of the county in which the 1577 annual public fair is to be located, who wish to form an 1578 association not for profit for the purpose of conducting and 1579 operating public fairs or expositions, may become incorporated 1580 in the following manner. The applicant must subscribers shall 1581 submit the proposed charter to the department for review and 1582 approval or denial. If the proposed charter is denied, the 1583 department must provide the applicant with a letter sent to the 1584 mailing address provided on the proposed charter and include a 1585 complete listing of all deficiencies, if any, which must be 1586 remedied before resubmittal of the proposed charter for 1587 approval. If the proposed charter is approved, the applicant 1588 must subscribers shall sign and present a notarized copy of the 1589 proposed charter to the judge of the circuit court for the 1590 county in which the principal office of the association will be 1591 located. The proposed charter must specify: 1592 (1)âThe name of the association and the place where the 1593 principal office is to be located. The name of the association 1594 must shall include the word, âInc.â 1595 (2)âThe general nature of the objectives and powers of the 1596 association, including a provision that the association is 1597 incorporated for the sole purpose of conducting and operating 1598 public fairs or expositions. 1599 (3)âThe qualifications and terms of association members and 1600 criteria for their admission and expulsion. Provision must may 1601 be made in the charter for ex officio membership. 1602 (4)âThe time for which the association is to exist. 1603 (5)âThe name and residence of each subscriber. 1604 (6)âProcedures for the election of and governance by 1605 officers, who may be elected or appointed. 1606 (7)âThe designation of officers who will manage the affairs 1607 of the association until the first election or appointment under 1608 the charter. 1609 (8)âProcedures for the adoption, amendment, or rescission 1610 of bylaws of the association. 1611 (9)âThe highest amount of indebtedness or liability that 1612 may be accrued by the association. 1613 (10)âThe name of an elected member of the board of county 1614 commissioners of the county in which the principal office of the 1615 association will be located, who will serve as an ex officio 1616 member of the board of directors of the association. 1617 (11)âThe official e-mail address of the association which 1618 will be used for the purpose of official communication between 1619 the association and governmental entities. 1620 (12)âThe language for the oath that will be taken by the 1621 applicant, which must include, but is not limited to, all of the 1622 following: 1623 (a)âThat the primary objective of the association is for 1624 public service and to hold, conduct, and promote public fairs or 1625 expositions. 1626 (b)âThat money and other available assets in value 1627 exceeding $5,000 have been provided for purposes designated by 1628 the association. 1629 (c)âThat the association will operate in good faith to 1630 carry out the purposes and objectives set forth in the charter. 1631 Section 42.âSection 616.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1632 read: 1633 616.02âFair associations per county Acknowledgment of 1634 charter.â 1635 (1)âBeginning July 1, 2026, there may be only one 1636 incorporated fair association per county in this state, 1637 excluding the state fair, which may be incorporated and 1638 conducted in any county. The department may not approve a 1639 proposed charter incorporating a fair association within the 1640 same county in which a fair association currently exists. The 1641 department may waive this requirement at the discretion of the 1642 Commissioner of Agriculture. 1643 (2)âAny fair association incorporated before July 1, 2026, 1644 may conduct public fairs or expositions and exercise the 1645 authority provided to them pursuant to this chapter The proposed 1646 charter of a fair association shall be acknowledged by at least 1647 three of its subscribers before an officer authorized to make 1648 acknowledgment of deeds. Subscribers shall also make and take an 1649 oath, which must be attached to the proposed charter, stating 1650 that the primary objective of the association is public service 1651 and holding, conducting, and promoting public fairs or 1652 expositions; that money and other available assets in value 1653 exceeding $5,000 have been provided for the purposes of the 1654 association; and that the association will operate in good faith 1655 to carry out the purposes and objectives set forth in its 1656 charter. 1657 Section 43.âSection 616.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1658 read: 1659 616.03âNotice of application; Approval and record of 1660 charter.âUpon approval by the department, A notice of intention 1661 to apply to the circuit court for the charter of a fair 1662 association must specify the date that application will be made, 1663 shall be sent to the department for approval, and shall be 1664 published in a newspaper in the county where the principal 1665 office of the association will be located once each week for 4 1666 consecutive weeks. The notice must briefly summarize the charter 1667 and objectives of the proposed association. the proposed charter 1668 must shall be submitted to and approved by the board of county 1669 commissioners of the county in which the principal office of the 1670 association will be located. After approval by the department 1671 and the board of county commissioners, the proposed charter and 1672 proof of approval must and publication shall be submitted to the 1673 circuit judge on the date specified in the notice. If no cause 1674 is shown to the contrary and the judge finds that the proposed 1675 charter is in proper form and will serve the primary objective 1676 of public service, the judge must shall approve the charter and 1677 issue an order incorporating the applicant subscribers under the 1678 charter for the objectives and purposes specified in the 1679 charter. The charter and order of incorporation must shall be 1680 recorded in the office of the clerk of the circuit court in the 1681 county where the principal office of the association will be 1682 located and provided to the department. After the order is 1683 recorded, the applicant subscribers and any their associates are 1684 incorporated with the objectives and powers established in the 1685 charter and under the name given in the charter. During the 1686 publication period, the proposed charter shall be on file in the 1687 office of the clerk of the circuit court. This section does not 1688 preclude a fair association from also filing its duly approved 1689 charter with the Department of State pursuant to chapter 617 for 1690 notice purposes. 1691 Section 44.âSubsection (2) of section 616.05, Florida 1692 Statutes, is amended to read: 1693 616.05âAmendment of charter.âA fair association may propose 1694 an amendment to its charter by resolution as provided in its 1695 charter or bylaws. 1696 (2)âAfter the department approves the proposed amendment, 1697 it will be incorporated into the original charter upon: 1698 (a)âPublication of notice in the same manner as provided in 1699 s. 616.03; 1700 (b)âFiling the order of the circuit judge approving the 1701 amendment with the office of the clerk of the circuit court and 1702 the department; and 1703 (b)(c)âBeing recorded in the clerkâs office. 1704 1705 If a fair association has filed its charter with the Department 1706 of State pursuant to chapter 617, a copy of any amendment to the 1707 charter must be filed with the Department of State for notice 1708 purposes. 1709 Section 45.âSection 616.051, Florida Statutes, is amended 1710 to read: 1711 616.051âDissolving a charter.â 1712 (1)âA fair association may dissolve its charter by 1713 resolution as provided in its charter or bylaws. The proposal 1714 for dissolving the charter shall be submitted to the department 1715 for approval. 1716 (2)âUpon approval by the department and upon presentation 1717 of sufficient evidence demonstrating and publication of notice 1718 and proof that all indebtedness has been paid and no claims are 1719 outstanding against the association, the circuit judge may, by 1720 decree, dissolve the association and order the distribution of 1721 its remaining assets. Such assets must be distributed, by 1722 resolution of the board of directors, to the county in which the 1723 principal office of the association is located unless otherwise 1724 specified by the deed of the property held by the association 1725 its remaining public funds to be distributed as recommended by 1726 the board of directors. 1727 Section 46.âSubsection (3) of section 616.07, Florida 1728 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (1) and (2) of that 1729 section are republished, to read: 1730 616.07âMembers not personally liable; property of 1731 association held in trust; exempt from taxation.â 1732 (1)âA member, officer, director, or trustee of a fair 1733 association is not personally liable for any of the debts of the 1734 association, and money or property of a fair association may not 1735 be distributed as profits or dividends among its members, 1736 officers, directors, or trustees. 1737 (2)âAll money and property of the association, except that 1738 necessary for the payment of its just debts and liabilities, are 1739 public property, shall be administered by the association as 1740 trustee, and shall be used exclusively for the legitimate 1741 purpose of the association. So long as they are used for that 1742 purpose, all money and property of the association are exempt 1743 from all forms of taxation, including special assessments, and 1744 any projects, activities, events, programs, and uses authorized 1745 by this part serve an essential governmental purpose and, 1746 therefore, are not taxable and are not subject to assessments. 1747 This subsection does not apply to chapter 212. 1748 (3)âUpon order of the circuit judge, any public funds or 1749 property remaining in a fair association when the association is 1750 dissolved shall be distributed by resolution of the board of 1751 directors to any county or any municipality within the county. 1752 The board may designate in the distribution resolution the 1753 public project that will benefit from the funds or the manner in 1754 which the property will be used. If property has been 1755 contributed by a municipality or county, the property shall be 1756 reconveyed to the municipality or county that gave the property 1757 to the association. 1758 Section 47.âSection 616.101, Florida Statutes, is amended 1759 to read: 1760 616.101âAnnual review of accounts and records; review of 1761 charter.â 1762 (1)âThe accounts and records of a every fair association 1763 whose annual public fair has an annual attendance of more than 1764 25,000, based upon recorded attendance from the previous year, 1765 must shall be reviewed annually by a qualified accountant 1766 licensed by the state. A fair association whose annual public 1767 fair has an annual attendance of 25,000 or fewer, based upon 1768 recorded attendance from the previous year, or a fair 1769 association that is holding an annual public fair for the first 1770 time, must submit an annual financial statement that has been 1771 signed by an officer of the county. The results of the reviews 1772 must shall be kept in the official records of each association, 1773 available to all directors of the association. A certified copy 1774 of the review must shall be filed with the department: 1775 (a)(1)âOn request by the department to certify expenditures 1776 of the premiums awarded to exhibitors of a fair or of building 1777 funds if when there is evidence of a violation of state laws; or 1778 (b)(2)âWhen the association is applying for a fair permit. 1779 (2)âA fair association shall, every 5 years beginning July 1780 1, 2026, review its charter and submit to the department a 1781 certified copy of the charter which incorporates any amendment 1782 made during the last 5 years. A designated member of the 1783 association shall attest that the charter is accurate and 1784 factual when submitting the certified copy to the department. 1785 Section 48.âSection 616.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1786 read: 1787 616.15âPermit from Department of Agriculture and Consumer 1788 Services required.â 1789 (1)âAn annual public fair may not be conducted by a fair 1790 association without a permit issued by the department. The 1791 association shall present to the department an application for a 1792 permit, signed by an officer of the association, at least 90 1793 calendar days 3 months before holding the annual public fair. 1794 The application must shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount 1795 to be determined by the department for processing the 1796 application and making any required investigation. The 1797 application fee must be at least $183 and may not exceed $366. 1798 Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the 1799 General Inspection Trust Fund of the State Treasury in a special 1800 account to be known as the âAgricultural and Livestock Fair 1801 Account.â A copy of the application must be sent to each fair 1802 association located within 50 miles of the site of the proposed 1803 annual public fair at the same time the application is sent to 1804 the department. The department may issue a permit if the 1805 applicant provides: 1806 (a)âThe opening and closing dates of the proposed annual 1807 public fair. 1808 (b)âThe name and address of the owner of the central 1809 amusement attraction that will operate during the annual public 1810 fair. 1811 (c)âAn affidavit properly executed by the president or 1812 chief executive officer of the applicant association certifying 1813 the existence of a binding contract entered into by the 1814 association and the owner of the central amusement attraction 1815 covering the period for which the permit from the department is 1816 applied. The contract between the parties must shall be 1817 available for inspection by duly authorized agents of the 1818 department in administering this chapter. 1819 (d)âA copy of the associationâs charter which incorporates 1820 all amendments made A written statement that the main purpose of 1821 the association is to conduct and operate a public fair and 1822 exposition, including the annual fair, for the benefit and 1823 development of the educational, agricultural, horticultural, 1824 livestock, charitable, historical, civic, cultural, scientific, 1825 and other resources of the geographical area the fair 1826 association represents and serves. The statement must be 1827 subscribed and acknowledged by an officer of the association 1828 before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments. 1829 (e)âA premium list of the current annual public fair to be 1830 conducted and or a copy of the previous yearâs premium list 1831 showing all premiums and awards to be offered to exhibitors in 1832 various departments of the annual public fair, which may 1833 include, but are not limited to, art exhibition;, beef cattle;, 1834 county exhibits;, dairy cattle;, horticulture;, swine;, womenâs 1835 department, 4-H Club activities;, Future Farmers of America 1836 activities; Family, Career and Community Leaders of America 1837 Future Homemakers of America activities;, poultry and egg 1838 exhibits;, and community exhibits. The premium list, which may 1839 be submitted separately from the application, must be submitted 1840 at least 60 calendar days before the annual public fair begins 1841 operation. 1842 (f)âA complete listing of all exhibits required pursuant to 1843 s. 616.17 Proof of liability insurance insuring the association 1844 against liability for injury to persons, in an amount of not 1845 less than $300,000 per occurrence. 1846 (g)âA copy of the most recent review. 1847 (h)âA list of all current members of the board of directors 1848 of the association and their contact information, including home 1849 address. 1850 1851 The department shall issue the permit within 10 calendar days 1852 after it receives all the information required by this 1853 subsection and the applicant qualifies pursuant to this section. 1854 (2)âAt least 21 calendar days before holding the annual 1855 public fair, the association shall present the department with 1856 all of the following information: 1857 (a)âProof of liability insurance insuring the association 1858 against liability for injury to persons, in an amount not less 1859 than $300,000 per occurrence. 1860 (b)âA copy of the associationâs most recent annual 1861 financial statement pursuant to s. 616.101. 1862 (c)âA list of all current members of the board of directors 1863 of the association and their contact information, including 1864 mailing addresses. 1865 (3)(2)âThe department shall administer and enforce the 1866 provisions of this chapter except as to the regulation of games, 1867 which shall be regulated by local law enforcement agencies. The 1868 department shall adopt rules to administer this chapter, 1869 including rules governing the form and contents of the 1870 application for the permit and any reports that it deems may 1871 deem necessary in enforcing the provisions of this chapter. 1872 (4)(3)âNotwithstanding any fair association meeting the 1873 requirements set forth in subsection (1), the department may 1874 order a full investigation to determine if the fair association 1875 meets the requirements of this part s. 616.01, and may withhold 1876 a permit from, deny a permit to, or withdraw a permit once 1877 issued to the association. The department shall also consider 1878 whether any proposed annual public fair, as set forth in an 1879 application for a permit, will compete with another annual 1880 public fair within 50 miles of the proposed annual public fair 1881 with respect to name, dates of operation, or market. The 1882 department may deny, withhold, or withdraw a permit from a fair 1883 association if the department determines that such fair 1884 association will compete with another association. The 1885 department shall give preference to existing fair associations 1886 with established dates, locations, and names. The determination 1887 by the department is final. 1888 Section 49.âSection 616.251, Florida Statutes, is amended 1889 to read: 1890 616.251âFlorida State Fair Authority; creation; 1891 responsibility for staging annual state fair; exemptions.â 1892 (1)âThere is created and constituted the âFlorida State 1893 Fair Authority,â a public body corporate and politic, for the 1894 purposes and with the powers set forth in this part. Such 1895 instrumentality, hereinafter referred to as âthe authority,â 1896 shall have perpetual succession. For the purposes of 1897 implementing the intent of this part, the authority shall be 1898 considered an instrumentality of the state, subject to the 1899 jurisdiction of the state. Any conflict with respect to that 1900 jurisdiction will be resolved by the authority and respective 1901 state agencies. 1902 (2)âThe authority shall operate under the supervision of 1903 the Commissioner of Agriculture, which supervision may include, 1904 but is not limited to, assisting, advising, and making 1905 recommendations regarding the financing and operation of the 1906 authority. In assisting and advising the authority, the 1907 Commissioner of Agriculture may make appropriate staff of the 1908 department available to the authority. 1909 (3)âThe authority is charged with the responsibility of 1910 staging an annual fair to serve the entire state. Cash premiums 1911 or awards may be given to exhibitors. 1912 (4)âThe authority shall be exempt from the requirements of 1913 part I of this chapter. 1914 (5)(4)âThe principal offices of the authority shall be in 1915 such place or places in or near the City of Tampa as the 1916 authority may from time to time designate. 1917 Section 50.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 1918 624.4032, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1919 624.4032âNonprofit agricultural organization medical 1920 benefit plans.â 1921 (2)âFor purposes of this section, the term ânonprofit 1922 agricultural organizationâ means an organization that meets all 1923 of the following criteria: 1924 (b)âIs exempt from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(5) s. 1925 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 1926 Section 51.âSubsection (1) of section 843.085, Florida 1927 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) of that section is 1928 republished, to read: 1929 843.085âUnlawful use of badges or other indicia of 1930 authority.â 1931 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person, unless appointed by the 1932 Governor pursuant to chapter 354, authorized by the appropriate 1933 agency, or displayed in a closed or mounted case as a collection 1934 or exhibit, to wear or display any authorized indicia of 1935 authority, including any badge, insignia, emblem, identification 1936 card, or uniform, or any colorable imitation thereof, of any 1937 federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency, or 1938 other criminal justice agency as defined in s. 943.045, with the 1939 intent to mislead or cause another person to believe that he or 1940 she is a member of that agency or is authorized to display or 1941 wear such item, or to wear or display any item that displays in 1942 any manner or combination the word or words âpolice,â 1943 âpatrolman,â âpatrolwoman,â âagent,â âsheriff,â âdeputy,â 1944 âtrooper,â âhighway patrol,â âcommission officer,â âWildlife 1945 Officer,â âDepartment of Environmental Protection officer,â 1946 âMarine Patrol Officer,â âstate attorney,â âpublic defender,â 1947 âmarshal,â âconstable,â âbailiff,â or âfire department,â 1948 âconcealed weapon permit,â or âconcealed weapon permitholder,â 1949 with the intent to mislead or cause another person to believe 1950 that he or she is a member of that agency, if applicable, or is 1951 authorized to wear or display such item. 1952 (5)âA violation of this section is a misdemeanor of the 1953 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 1954 775.083. This section is cumulative to any law now in force in 1955 the state. 1956 Section 52.âSubsection (27) is added to section 934.02, 1957 Florida Statutes, to read: 1958 934.02âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 1959 (27)ââSignal jamming deviceâ means a device or process, 1960 such as a phone jammer, global positioning systems blocker, or 1961 other similar device designed to intentionally block, jam, or 1962 interfere with radio communications, such as cellular and 1963 personal communication services, police radar, or global 1964 positioning systems. 1965 Section 53.âSection 934.51, Florida Statutes, is created to 1966 read: 1967 934.51âPossession, use, and sale of signal jamming device; 1968 prohibition; exceptions; penalties.â 1969 (1)âPROHIBITION.âIt is unlawful to possess, manufacture, 1970 hold or offer for sale, sell, import, distribute, or use a 1971 signal jamming device in this state. 1972 (2)âEXCEPTIONS.âThis section does not apply to a federal or 1973 military law enforcement agency that lawfully installs, places, 1974 or uses a signal jamming device as part of a criminal 1975 investigation, or to any person duly authorized by the Federal 1976 Communications Commission. 1977 (3)âPENALTIES.âA person who violates this section commits a 1978 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 1979 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1980 Section 54.â(1)âThe Citrus Research and Development 1981 Foundation, Inc., the nonprofit corporation established in s. 1982 573.112(7), Florida Statutes, is merged into the Citrus Research 1983 and Field Trial Foundation, Inc. 1984 (2)âThe Citrus Research and Development Foundation, Inc., 1985 must enter into a plan with the Citrus Research and Field Trial 1986 Foundation, Inc., for the merger. Such merger must be completed 1987 by October 1, 2026. The merger is subject to chapter 617, 1988 Florida Statutes, related to the merger of nonprofit 1989 corporations. 1990 (3)âAny funds held in trust which were donated to or earned 1991 by the Citrus Research and Development Foundation, Inc., shall 1992 be transferred to the Citrus Research and Field Trial 1993 Foundation, Inc., and shall be used for the original purposes of 1994 the funds. 1995 (4)âThe transfer of any program, activity, duty, or 1996 function under this act includes the transfer of any records and 1997 unexpected balances of appropriations, allocations, or other 1998 funds related to such program, activity, duty, or function. 1999 Except as otherwise provided by law, the Citrus Research and 2000 Field Trial Foundation, Inc., shall become the custodian of any 2001 property of the Citrus Research and Development Foundation, 2002 Inc., on the date specified in the plan of merger or October 1, 2003 2026, whichever occurs first. 2004 Section 55.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) and subsection 2005 (6) of section 288.1175, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2006 288.1175âAgriculture education and promotion facility.â 2007 (4)âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 2008 shall certify a facility as an agriculture education and 2009 promotion facility if the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 2010 Services determines that: 2011 (a)âThe applicant is a unit of local government as defined 2012 in s. 218.369, or a fair association as defined in s. 616.001(8) 2013 s. 616.001(11), which is responsible for the planning, design, 2014 permitting, construction, renovation, management, and operation 2015 of the agriculture education and promotion facility or holds 2016 title to the property on which such facility is to be developed 2017 and located. 2018 (6)âFunds may not be expended to develop or subsidize 2019 privately owned facilities, except for facilities owned by fair 2020 associations as defined in s. 616.001(8) s. 616.001(11). 2021 Section 56.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2022 made by this act to section 287.1351, Florida Statutes, in a 2023 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 287.056, Florida 2024 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2025 287.056âPurchases from purchasing agreements and state term 2026 contracts; vendor disqualification.â 2027 (4)âA firm or individual placed on the suspended vendor 2028 list pursuant to s. 287.1351 or placed on a disqualified vendor 2029 list pursuant to s. 287.133 or s. 287.134 is immediately 2030 disqualified from state term contract eligibility. 2031 Section 57.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2032 made by this act to section 287.1351, Florida Statutes, in a 2033 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 287.138, Florida 2034 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2035 287.138âContracting with entities of foreign countries of 2036 concern prohibited.â 2037 (5)âThe Attorney General may bring a civil action in any 2038 court of competent jurisdiction against an entity that violates 2039 this section. Violations of this section may result in: 2040 (a)âA civil penalty equal to twice the amount of the 2041 contract for which the entity submitted a bid or proposal for, 2042 replied to, or entered into; 2043 (b)âIneligibility to enter into, renew, or extend any 2044 contract, including any grant agreements, with any governmental 2045 entity for up to 5 years; 2046 (c)âIneligibility to receive or renew any license, 2047 certification, or credential issued by a governmental entity for 2048 up to 5 years; and 2049 (d)âPlacement on the suspended vendor list pursuant to s. 2050 287.1351. 2051 Section 58.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2052 made by this act to section 500.04, Florida Statutes, in a 2053 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 500.177, Florida 2054 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2055 500.177âPenalty for violation of s. 500.04; dissemination 2056 of false advertisement.â 2057 (1)âAny person who violates any provision of s. 500.04 is 2058 guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 2059 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083; but, if the violation is 2060 committed after a conviction of such person under this section 2061 has become final, such person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the 2062 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 2063 775.083. 2064 Section 59.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2065 made by this act to section 616.07, Florida Statutes, in a 2066 reference thereto, subsection (13) of section 212.08, Florida 2067 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2068 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 2069 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 2070 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 2071 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 2072 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 2073 chapter. 2074 (13)âLIMITATIONS ON EXEMPTIONS.âNo transactions shall be 2075 exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter except those 2076 expressly exempted herein. All laws granting tax exemptions, to 2077 the extent they may be inconsistent or in conflict with this 2078 chapter, including, but not limited to, the following designated 2079 laws, shall yield to and be superseded by the provisions of this 2080 subsection: ss. 125.019, 153.76, 154.2331, 159.15, 159.31, 2081 159.50, 159.708, 163.385, 163.395, 215.76, 243.33, 315.11, 2082 348.65, 348.762, 349.13, 403.1834, 616.07, and 623.09, and the 2083 following Laws of Florida, acts of the year indicated: s. 31, 2084 chapter 30843, 1955; s. 19, chapter 30845, 1955; s. 12, chapter 2085 30927, 1955; s. 8, chapter 31179, 1955; s. 15, chapter 31263, 2086 1955; s. 13, chapter 31343, 1955; s. 16, chapter 59-1653; s. 13, 2087 chapter 59-1356; s. 12, chapter 61-2261; s. 19, chapter 61-2754; 2088 s. 10, chapter 61-2686; s. 11, chapter 63-1643; s. 11, chapter 2089 65-1274; s. 16, chapter 67-1446; and s. 10, chapter 67-1681. 2090 This subsection does not supersede the authority of a local 2091 government to adopt financial and local government incentives 2092 pursuant to s. 163.2517. 2093 Section 60.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2094 made by this act to section 616.15, Florida Statutes, in a 2095 reference thereto, section 616.185, Florida Statutes, is 2096 reenacted to read: 2097 616.185âTrespass upon grounds or facilities of public fair; 2098 penalty; arrests.â 2099 (1)âFor the purposes of this chapter, trespass upon the 2100 grounds of the Florida State Fair Authority or any other fair 2101 association permitted under s. 616.15 means: 2102 (a)âEntering and remaining upon any grounds or facilities 2103 owned, operated, or controlled by the Florida State Fair 2104 Authority or any other association permitted under s. 616.15 and 2105 committing any act that disrupts the orderly conduct of any 2106 authorized activity of the fair association in charge, or its 2107 lessees, licensees, or the general public on those grounds or 2108 facilities; or 2109 (b)âEntering and remaining on those grounds or facilities 2110 after being directed not to enter or to leave them by the 2111 executive director of the authority, chief administrative 2112 officer of the fair association, or any employee or agent of the 2113 association designated by the executive director or 2114 administrator to maintain order on those grounds and facilities, 2115 after a determination by the executive director, administrator, 2116 employee, or agent that the entering or remaining on those 2117 grounds or facilities is in violation of the rules and 2118 regulations of the Florida State Fair Authority or permitted 2119 fair association or is disrupting the orderly conduct of any 2120 authorized activity of the fair association in charge, or its 2121 lessees, licensees, or the general public on those grounds or 2122 facilities. 2123 (2)âAny person committing the offense of trespass upon the 2124 grounds of the Florida State Fair Authority or any other fair 2125 association permitted under s. 616.15 commits a misdemeanor of 2126 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 2127 775.083. 2128 (3)âA law enforcement officer may arrest any person on or 2129 off the premises, without a warrant, if the officer has probable 2130 cause for believing such person has committed the offense of 2131 trespass upon the grounds of the Florida State Fair Authority or 2132 any fair association permitted under s. 616.15. Such an arrest 2133 does not render the law enforcement officer criminally or 2134 civilly liable for false arrest, false imprisonment, or unlawful 2135 detention. 2136 Section 61.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.